Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.368

Nutrition, health, and physical education model policy and procedure.

(1)(a) By April 1, 2024, the Washington state school directors' association, with the assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must review and update a model policy and procedure regarding nutrition, health, and physical education.

(b) The model policy and procedure must:

(i) Aim to make elementary school recess safe, inclusive, and high quality for all students;

(ii) Encourage physical activity breaks for middle and high school students;

(iii) Align with the requirements in RCW 28A.230.295;

(iv) Encourage elementary school recess to be scheduled before lunch, whenever possible, to reduce food waste, maximize nutrition, and allow students to be active before eating;

(v) Discourage withholding recess as a disciplinary or punitive action except when a student's participation in recess poses an immediate threat to the safety of the student or others, and create a process to find and deploy alternatives to the withholding of recess;

(vi) Discourage the withholding of recess to have a student complete academic work;

(vii) Prohibit the use of physical activity during the school day as punishment, such as having students run laps or do push-ups as a punitive action; and

(viii) Align with corporal punishment requirements established in WAC 392-400-825.

(2) By the beginning of the 2024-25 school year, school districts must adopt or amend if necessary policies and procedures that, at a minimum, incorporate all the elements described in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2023 c 272 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 272: See note following RCW 28A.230.295.